src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON LAIGOHADDAINCH
! +Use/-Spell: DeverbalNounsDIEHTALADDA ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt+Sg1:Q3n 12pflag ;       ! bohton
 +Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ;       ! bohtos
 +Imprt+Du2:Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +Imprt+Du3:Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:Q3t 12pflag ;       ! bohtot
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:Y2t 12pflag ;       ! boahttut
! +Imprt+Pl2+Err/Orth:Y1t ENDLEX ;       ! láigohaddit
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-KJ:Q2t 12pflag ;       ! bohtet
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-GG:Y3t 12pflag ;       ! boahttet
 +Imprt+Pl3:Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
 +Imprt: ImprtV2 ;
 +Imprt:Q6 ImprtSg2 ; !Prs:Q6 ImprtSg2
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 :Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms


LEXICON DIEHTISHORTINCH
DeverbalNounsDIEHTISHORT ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON DIEHTILONGSHORTINCH
DeverbalNounsDIEHTILONGSHORT ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;

LEXICON BAHCCIINCH
DeverbalNounsBAHCCI ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> GOAHTICnj ;
 +Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 BOAHTICnj ;


!LEXICON AT_IV_CGforms (not in use)
! +V+IV: AT_CGforms ;

LEXICON AT_TV_CGforms
 +V+TV: AT_CGforms ;


LEXICON AT_CGforms
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV1 ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV1 ;
 +Ind+Prs+ConNeg: K ;


LEXICON BOAHTICnj
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt: ImprtVA ;
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 :Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms

LEXICON DOALVUCnj
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1ut ;
 +Imprt: ImprtVA ;
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 :Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms



LEXICON GOAHTICnj       !!≈ * **@CODE@**  for speller reasons to hinder -goahttit, whick is confused with infinitive -goahtit
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt:Q6 ImprtSg2 ;
 +Imprt: ImprtV2 ;
 +Imprt+Sg1:Q3n 12pflag ;       ! bohton
 +Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ;       ! bohtos
 +Imprt+Du2:Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +Imprt+Du3:Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-KJ:Q3t 12pflag ;       ! bohtot
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:Y2t 12pflag ;       ! boahttut
! Imprt+Pl2+Err/Orth:Y1t ENDLEX ;       ! boahttit
! Imprt+Pl1:Y3t ENDLEX ;      ! boahttut     ! This renders boahttet that are wrong
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-KJ:Q2t 12pflag ;       ! bohtet
 +Imprt+Pl2+Dial/-GG:Y3t 12pflag ;       ! boahttet
 +Imprt+Pl3:Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
 NominalFormsV ;

LEXICON RAIMMAHALLACnj       !!≈ * **@CODE@**  restricted imperatives
 +Ind+Prs: PrsV ;
 +Ind+Prt: PrtV ;
 +Pot+Prs:Q7ž PotC ;
 +Cond: CondV1 ;
 +Imprt:Q6 ImprtSg2 ;
 +Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ;       ! bohtos
 +Imprt+Du2:Y1 12pflag ;        ! boahtti
 +Imprt+Du3:Q3ska 12pflag ;     ! bohtoska
 +Imprt+Pl1+Dial/-GG:Y2t 12pflag ;       ! boahttut
 +Imprt+Pl2+Err/Orth:Y1t 12pflag ;       ! boahttit
 +Imprt+Pl3:Q3set 12pflag ;     ! bohtoset
 +Imprt+Du1:Y2 12pflag ;
 :X1 NominalFormsV1 ;
 :X4 NominalFormsV2 ;
 +Use/NG:Q6 NominalFormsV3 ;
 :X2 NominalFormsV4 ;
! +Use/-Spell:Q3 NominalFormsV5 ;
 +Use/-Spell:Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;
! check whether V7 and V8 should
! be deleted as V3 doublets
 :X6 NominalFormsV9 ; ! supine forms

LEXICON CondV1
 +Prs:X6š CondBOAHTI ;         ! General -š- forms
 +Prs+Use/NG:X6l CondBOAHTI ;      
   !   ! -l- forms soppolin
 +Prs+Err/Orth:X6šivčče%> CondC ; !gorošivččii, generell sti
 +Prs+Err/Orth:X6livčče%> CondC ; !gorolivččii

LEXICON CondV1ut
 +Prs:X6š CondBOAHTI ;         ! General -š- forms
 +Prs:Q4l CondBOAHTI ;         ! !     -l- forms goarulin
 +Prs+Err/Orth:X6l CondBOAHTI ;         !   ! -l- forms soppolin
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q6š CondBOAHTI ; ! biegošin 
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q4š CondBOAHTI ; !gaikkušin
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q4šivčče%> CondC ; !áiggušivččii
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q4livčče%> CondC ; !áiggulivččii
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q6šivčče%> CondC ; ! goarošivččii, ikke dift.forenk
 +Prs+Err/Orth:Q6livčče%> CondC ; ! goarolivččii
 +Prs+Err/Orth:X6šivčče%> CondC ; !gorošivččii, generell sti
 +Prs+Err/Orth:X6livčče%> CondC ; !gorolivččii

LEXICON CondBOAHTI
 +Sg1:in 12pflagK ;
 +Sg2:it 12pflagK ;
 +Pl3:edje K ;
 +Pl3+Use/NGminip+Use/NG:e K ;
 +ConNeg:e K ;
 +ConNeg+Err/Orth:ij K ;
 PrtC2 ;

LEXICON ARVICnj
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3:Q1 K ; ! Q1 because arvi is wrong
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3:^DISIMPj K ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:Q6 K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3:X6šij K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Use/NG:X6lij K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+Sg3+Err/Orth:Q4lij K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:X6še K ;
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:X6le K ;  ! ! X6 = i > á,
 +V+IV+Cond+Prs+ConNeg+Err/Orth:Q4le K ;  !   !Q4 i > á "Stem Vowel shift i:á"
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Dial/-GG:Q7ž K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+Sg3+Dial/-KJ:Q7ža K ;
 +V+IV+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:Q7ž K ;
 +V+IV+Imprt+Sg3:Q3s 12pflag ; !Prs
 +V+IV+PrfPrc:X2n K ;
 +V+IV:%>Y1 NominalFormsV6 ;	!álddagasti
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:X2n K ;
 +V+IV+Inf:t K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Nom:n K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Gen:n K ; ! ! (Re?)introducing?
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess:me K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Use/NG:min K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Ess+Use/NG:men K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Loc:mis K ;
 +V+IV+Actio+Com:mijn K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»min K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess:»me K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Ess+Use/NG:»men K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgNom:»n R ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Nom:»n K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:»n K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Gen:»ma K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Acc:»ma K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Cmp/SgGen:»ma R ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Ill:»mij K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Loc:»mis K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com:»mijn K ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/NomAct+N+Sg+Com+Err/Orth:»mijnna K ;
 +V+IV:X4 NominalFormsV8 ;
 +V+IV:Q6 NominalFormsV8 ;
 +V+IV:X6 NominalFormsV9 ;
 +V+IV: SG3PASSV ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V:»goahºti%> BOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
 +V+IV+Der4+Der/InchL+V+Err/Orth:»goahtti%> GOAHTICnj " INCH" ;
! Directly to this INCH, and not via the same path as the others, as arvi- does
! not get passive (& not deverbal nouns?). As a safety first -option, I do not add
! more than this one line now.




!! ## Basic lexica for contracted verbs
!!! 1. DEFAULT SECTION
!   -------------------------


LEXICON GILLE_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**  Contracted Verbs without Personal Passive
 +V+IV:%> CIRROStem ;
 +V+IV:»j SG3PASS ;
 +V+IV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+IV: DeverbalVerbsGILLE ;
 +V+IV:%> NominalFormsV9 ;


LEXICON DOHPPE_TV  !!≈ * **@CODE@** Contracted Verbs with Personal Passive
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEStem ;
 +V+TV:»j PASSIVE ;
! +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+V+IV+Der4+Der/supmi+N+Sg+Ill+Use/-PLX:»supmái K ; !just for evenstems
 +V+TV:%> DOHPPEINCH ;
 +V+TV: DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE ;
 +V+TV:%> NominalFormsV9 ; !Sup




!! ###  BAsic lexica for Contracted verbs
!!! 2. SPECIAL SECTION:
!   2a. Impersonals
!   2b. already derived words
!   2c. lexicas tweaked (mostly) for speller reasons
!   2d. other special lexicas
!   ----------------------------------------------





! 2a. Impersonals
!   ----------------------------------------------
