src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Humsubj-VerbRoot   !!= * **@CODE@**
argumenteret+OLang/NOB:argumentere GILLE_IV ;
associeret+OLang/SWE:associ^ere DOHPPE_TV ;   ! ^
bovlet:bovle GILLE_IV ;
bovret:bovre DOHPPE_TV ;
differensieret+OLang/NOB:differensi^ere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
duostat+Err/Orth:duosta AT_TV_CGforms ;
durget:durge DOHPPE_TV ;
dutkat+Err/Orth:dutka AT_TV_CGforms ;
fantaseret+OLang/NOB:fantasere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
fillet:fille DOHPPE_TV ;
gillet:gille GILLE_IV ;
globaliseret+OLang/NOB:globalisere DOHPPE_TV ;
hehttet:hehtte DOHPPE_TV ;
hehttot:hehtto GILLE_IV ;
institušonaliseret+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB:in^stitušunalisere DOHPPE_TV ; !
kohkket:kohkke DOHPPE_TV ;
konkluderet+OLang/NOB:kon^kludere GILLE_IV ;
kursiveret+OLang/NOB:kursivere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
liikot:lijko GILLE_IV ;
lovpet+Err/Orth:lohpe DOHPPE_TV ;
lávket:lávke GILLE_IV ;
millet:mille DOHPPE_TV ;
monnet:monne GILLE_IV ;
njezzet:njezze GILLE_IV ;
kápret+OLang/NOB+Err/Orth-a-á:kapre DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
ordet:orde GILLE_IV ;
ploget:ploge DOHPPE_TV ;
publiseret+OLang/NOB:publisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
rekrutteret+OLang/NOB:re^kruttere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
rostet:roste GILLE_IV ;
rusket:ruske DOHPPE_TV ;
siktet:sikte DOHPPE_TV ;
skolet:skole GILLE_IV ;
spesialiseret+Err/Orth-a-á+OLang/NOB:spesi^álisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN !
studeret+OLang/NOB:studere DOHPPE_TV ;
stálet:stále GILLE_IV ;
tinet:tine DOHPPE_TV ;
vustet:vuste GILLE_IV ;
válljet+Err/Orth:válje DOHPPE_TV ;
čuldet:čulde DOHPPE_TV ;
biipet:bijpe GILLE_IV ;
liŋket:liŋke DOHPPE_TV ;
rosset:rosse GILLE_IV ;
disputeret+OLang/NOB:disputere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
nationaliseret+OLang/NOB:nationalisere DOHPPE_TV ;
privilegeret+Err/Orth+OLang/SWE:priviligere GILLE_IV ; ! ^
bremset+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:bremse GILLE_IV ; !LIA
forliset+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:forlise GILLE_IV ; !LIA
påstået+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:påståe DOHPPE_TV ; !LIA
lønnet+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:lønne GILLE_IV ; !LIA
blandet+Err/Lex+Use/LIA:blande DOHPPE_TV ; !LIA
mosjoneret+OLang/NOB:mosjonere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
jubmet:jubme GILLE_IV ;
suvget:suvge DOHPPE_TV ;
LEXICON 3-VerbRoot
aiget:ajge GILLE_IV ;
appliceret+OLang/SWE:ap^plicere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
arriveret+OLang/NOB:arrivere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
breseret+OLang/NOB:bresere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
chevroteret+OLang/NOB:chevrotere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
dekstet:dekste GILLE_IV ;
demaskeret+OLang/NOB:demaskere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
dilket:dilke DOHPPE_TV ;
divergeret+OLang/NOB:divergere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
dášket:dáške GILLE_IV ;
eaŋkilšliipet:eaŋkil#šlijpe DOHPPE_TV ;
elljet:ellje GILLE_IV ;
europeiseret+OLang/NOB:europe^isere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
exploderet+OLang/SWE:ex^plodere GILLE_IV ; ! ^
filtet:filte GILLE_IV ;
fluoriseret+OLang/NOB:fluorisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
fraksjoneret+OLang/NOB:fraksjonere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
galopperet+OLang/NOB:galoppere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
glasseret+OLang/NOB:glassere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
goret:gore GILLE_IV ;
harmoneret+OLang/NOB:harmonere GILLE_IV ;
iilet:ijle DOHPPE_TV ;
illámovet:illá#move GILLE_IV ;
jazzifiseret+OLang/NOB:jazzifisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
jáfet:jáfe GILLE_IV ;
kollationeret+OLang/NOB+Err/Orth:kollašonere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
kollideret+OLang/NOB:kollidere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
kontribueret+OLang/NOB:kon^tribu^ere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
krackeleret+OLang/SWE:krackelere GILLE_IV ; ! ^
kuitet:kujte DOHPPE_TV ;
lošeret+Err/Orth+OLang/SWE:logere GILLE_IV ; ! ^
makadamiseret+OLang/NOB:makadamisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
mousseret+OLang/SWE:moussere GILLE_IV ; ! ^
navvet:navve DOHPPE_TV ;
novret:novre GILLE_IV ;
parcelleret+OLang/SWE:parcellere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
participeret+OLang/NOB:participere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN  SW
porträtteret+OLang/SWE:porträttere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
profeteret+OLang/NOB:profetere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
recenseret+OLang/NOB:recensere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
resocialiseret+OLang/SWE:resoci^alisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
returneret+OLang/NOB:returnere GILLE_IV ; ! ^LOAN
rumsteret+OLang/SWE:rumstere GILLE_IV ; ! ^
schematiseret+OLang/SWE:schematisere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
siiget:sijge GILLE_IV ;
skvadroneret+OLang/NOB:skvadronere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
skáđet:skáđe GILLE_IV ;
storret:storre GILLE_IV ;
stratifieret+OLang/SWE:stratifi^ere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^
telekseret+OLang/NOB:teleksere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
tulljet:tullje GILLE_IV ;
validiteret+OLang/NOB:validitere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN
šeneret+Err/Orth+OLang/NOB:sjenere DOHPPE_TV ; ! ^LOAN NOR
šlávet:šláve GILLE_IV ;
